Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 4. Conduct of Election; Election Results.
§ 24.2-668.
Pollbooks, statements of results, and ballots to be sealed and delivered to clerk or general registrar.

After ascertaining the results and before adjourning, the officers shall put the pollbooks, the duplicate statements of results, and any printed inspection and return sheets in the envelopes provided by the State Board. The officers shall seal the envelopes and direct them to the clerk of the circuit court for the county or city. The pollbooks, statements, and sheets thus sealed and directed, the sealed counted ballots envelope or container, and the unused, defaced, spoiled and set aside ballots properly accounted for, packaged and sealed, shall be conveyed by one of the officers to be determined by lot, if they cannot otherwise agree, to the clerk of court by noon on the day following the election.The clerk shall retain custody of the pollbooks, printed ballots, and other elections materials until the time has expired for initiating a recount, contest, or other proceeding in which the pollbooks, printed ballots, and other elections materials may be needed as evidence and there is no proceeding pending. The clerk shall (i) secure all pollbooks, printed ballots and other election materials in sealed boxes; (ii) place all of the sealed boxes in a vault or room not open to the public or to anyone other than the clerk and his staff; (iii) cause such vault or room to be securely locked except when access is necessary for the clerk and his staff; and (iv) upon the initiation of a recount, certify that these security measures have been taken in whatever form is deemed appropriate by the chief judge.After that time the clerk shall deliver the pollbooks to the general registrar who shall return the pollbooks or transfer a copy of the electronic data to the State Board as directed by §

24.2-114

for voting credit purposes. After the pollbooks are returned by the State Board, the general registrar shall retain the pollbooks in his principal office for two years from the date of the election. The clerk shall retain the statement of results and any printed inspection and return sheets for two years and may then destroy them.

The local electoral board or general registrar may direct that the officers of election, in lieu of conveying the materials to the clerk of the circuit court as provided in subsection A, shall convey the materials to the principal office of the general registrar on the night of the election or the morning following the election as the board directs. The general registrar shall secure and retain the materials in his office and shall convey to the clerk of the court, by noon of the day following the ascertainment of the results of the election by the electoral board, all of the election materials. The general registrar shall retain for public inspection one copy of the statement of results.

If an electronic pollbook is used, the data disc or cartridge containing the electronic records of the election, or, alternately, a printed copy of the pollbook records of those who voted, shall be transmitted, sealed and retained as required by this section, and otherwise treated as the pollbook for that election for all purposes subsequent to the election. Nothing in this title shall be construed to require that the equipment or software used to produce the electronic pollbook be sealed or retained along with the pollbook, provided that the records for the election have been transferred or printed according to the instructions of the State Board.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-232, 24-267, 24-268, 24-270; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-143, 24.1-144; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 247; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1978, c. 778; 1981, c. 425; 1992, c. 293; 1993, c. 641; 1995, c. 197; 1996, c. 8; 1997, cc. 438, 456; 2002, c. 190; 2003, c. 1015; 2004, cc. 410, 835; 2007, c. 285; 2016, cc. 18, 492; 2020, c. 294.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 410, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act affecting uniformed and overseas voters as defined in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (42 U.S.C. § 1973ff [now 52 USC § 20301] et seq.) shall be applicable to any Federal Post Card Application received from such voter after November 4, 2003.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 86 B, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Any locality using paper pollbooks for elections held beginning in November, 2010, shall be responsible for entering voting credit as provided in §

24.2-668

. Additionally, any locality using paper pollbooks for elections held after November, 2010 may be required to reimburse the Department of Elections for state costs associated with providing paper pollbooks.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 190 substituted “two years” for “five years” in the second sentence of the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, substituted “return the pollbooks or transfer a copy of the electronic data to the State Board as directed by §

24.2-114

for voting credit purposes. After the pollbooks are returned by the State Board, the general registrar shall retain the pollbooks in his principal office” for “preserve them” in the second paragraph of subsection A; inserted “or the morning following the election as the board directs” in the first sentence of subsection B; and added subsection C.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 410, effective April 12, 2004, substituted “Provisional” for “Conditional” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection B.

The 2004 amendment by c. 835, in subsection B, in the next-to-last sentence, substituted “ascertainment of the results of the election by the electoral board” for “election” and deleted “except the envelopes containing the ‘Conditional Votes,’ and the envelopes containing the pollbooks, the statements of results and, if mechanical voting machines are used, one copy of the printed return sheet” at the end and deleted “and shall immediately convey to the clerk sealed envelopes containing all remaining election materials” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 285, in the second paragraph of subsection A, inserted “paper ballots, and other elections materials” twice in the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and inserted “or general registrar” and deleted “of this section” following “subsection A” in subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 294, substituted “paper ballots” for “printed ballots” wherever it appears in the second paragraph of subsection A.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, §§ 59, 71.

§ 24.2-669.
Clerk to keep ballots; inspection; destruction.

The clerk to whom the counted and uncounted ballots are delivered shall, without breaking the seal, deposit them in a secure place in his office, where they shall be kept for the time required by this section. He shall not allow the ballots to be inspected except (i) by an authorized representative of the State Board or by the electoral board at the direction of the State Board to ensure the accuracy of the returns or the purity of the election, (ii) by the officers of election, and then only at the direction of the electoral board in accordance with §

24.2-672

when the provisions of §

24.2-662

have not been followed, (iii) on the order of a court before which there is pending a proceeding for a contest or recount under Chapter 8 (§

24.2-800

et seq.) of this title or before whom there is then pending a proceeding in which the ballots are necessary for use in evidence, or (iv) for the purpose of conducting a risk-limiting audit pursuant to §

24.2-671.2

. In the event that ballots are inspected under clause (i), (ii), or (iv) of this paragraph, each political party and each independent candidate on the ballot, or each primary candidate, shall be entitled to have a representative present during such inspection. The representatives and observers lawfully present shall be prohibited from interfering with the officers of election in any way. The State Board or local electoral board shall provide such parties and candidates reasonable advance notice of the inspection.

After the counted ballots for a federal election have remained in the clerk’s office for two years, if no election contest or other proceeding is pending in which such ballots may be needed as evidence, the clerk shall destroy such ballots. After the counted ballots for any other election have remained in the clerk’s office for one year, if no election contest or other proceeding is pending in which such ballots may be needed as evidence, the clerk shall destroy such ballots. After the unused ballots have remained in the clerk’s office and the time has expired for initiating a recount, contest, or other proceeding in which such ballots may be needed as evidence and no such contest or proceeding is pending, the clerk may then destroy the unused ballots other than punchcard ballots, which shall be returned to the electoral board.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-268, 24-270; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-144; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1978, c. 778; 1981, c. 425; 1992, c. 293; 1993, c. 641; 1998, c. 270; 2003, c. 1015; 2006, c. 689; 2008, c. 565; 2022, cc. 443, 444.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, inserted “other than punchcard ballots, which shall be returned to the electoral board” at the end of the last paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 689 added the third through fifth sentences in the first paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 565, in the first paragraph, inserted clause (iv) and made related changes in the second sentence; and substituted “clause (i), (ii), or (iv) of this paragraph” for “clause (i) or (ii) of this paragraph” in the third sentence.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 443 and 444 are identical, and substituted “a risk-limiting audit pursuant to §

24.2-671.2

” for “an audit as part of a post-election pilot program pursuant to § 24.2-671.1” in the first paragraph in clause (iv).

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

§ 24.2-670.
Clerk to send for books and ballots if not delivered by officers.

If the officers of election fail to deliver the materials to the clerk of the circuit court, or to the principal office of the general registrar, as required by §

24.2-668

before the time for the electoral board to meet and open the returns, the clerk of the circuit court shall dispatch, to obtain such returns, a law-enforcement officer, who shall be subject to the same penalties and entitled to the same compensation as an officer of election for such service.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-269; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-145; 1993, c. 641; 1995, c. 197.

§ 24.2-671.
Electoral board to meet and ascertain results; conclusiveness of results.

Each electoral board shall meet at the clerk’s or general registrar’s office of the county or city for which they are appointed at or before 5:00 p.m. on the day after any election. The board may adjourn to another room of sufficient size in a public building to ascertain the results, and may adjourn as needed, not to exceed seven calendar days from the date of the election unless an extension has been granted to accommodate a risk-limiting audit conducted pursuant to §

24.2-671.2

. Written directions to the location of any room other than the clerk’s or general registrar’s office where the board will meet shall be posted at the doors of the clerk’s and general registrar’s offices prior to the beginning of the meeting.

The board shall open the returns delivered by the officers.

If the electoral board has exercised the option provided by §

24.2-668

for delivery of the election materials to the office of the general registrar on the night of the election, the electoral board shall meet at the office of the general registrar at or before 5:00 p.m. on the day after any election.

The board shall ascertain from the returns the total votes in the county or city, or town in a town election, for each candidate and for and against each question and complete the abstract of votes cast at such election, as provided for in §

24.2-675

. For any office in which no person was elected by write-in votes, and for which the total number of write-in votes for that office is less than (i) 10 percent of the total number of votes cast for that office and (ii) the total number of votes cast for the candidate receiving the most votes, the electoral board shall ascertain the total votes for each write-in candidate for the office within one week following the election. For offices for which the electoral board issues the certificate of election, the result so ascertained, signed and attested, shall be conclusive and shall not thereafter be subject to challenge except as specifically provided in Chapter 8 (§

24.2-800

et seq.).

Once the result is so ascertained, the secretary of the electoral board shall deliver one copy of each statement of results to the general registrar to be available for inspection when his office is open for business. The secretary shall then return all pollbooks, any printed inspection and return sheets, and one copy of each statement of results to the clerk.

Beginning with the general election in November 2007, a report of any changes made by the local electoral board to the unofficial results ascertained by the officers of election or any subsequent change to the official abstract of votes made by the local electoral board shall be forwarded to the State Board of Elections and the explanation of such change shall be posted on the State Board website.

Each political party and each independent candidate on the ballot, or each primary candidate, shall be entitled to have representatives present when the local electoral board meets to ascertain the results of the election. Each such party and candidate shall be entitled to have at least as many representatives present as there are teams of officials working to ascertain the results, and the room in which the local electoral board meets shall be of sufficient size and configuration to allow the representatives reasonable access and proximity to view the ballots as the teams of officials work to ascertain the results. The representatives and observers lawfully present shall be prohibited from interfering with the officials in any way. It is unlawful for any person to knowingly possess any firearm as defined in §

18.2-308.2:2

within 40 feet of any building, or part thereof, used as a meeting place for the local electoral board while the electoral board meets to ascertain the results of an election, unless such person is (a) any law-enforcement officer or any retired law-enforcement officer qualified pursuant to subsection C of §

18.2-308.016

; (b) occupying his own private property that falls within 40 feet of a polling place; or (c) an armed security officer, licensed pursuant to Article 4 (§

9.1-138

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 9.1, whose employment or performance of his duties occurs within 40 feet of any building, or part thereof, used as a meeting place for the local electoral board while the electoral board meets to ascertain the results of an election.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-271, 24-272; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-146; 1973, c. 30; 1981, c. 425; 1991, c. 388; 1992, c. 329; 1993, c. 641; 1996, cc. 8, 223; 2003, c. 1015; 2005, c. 824; 2006, c. 689; 2014, c. 486; 2018, c. 536; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 459; 2022, cc. 443, 444.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, split the former first paragraph into the present first and second paragraphs, and rewrote both, the first paragraph formerly read: “Each electoral board shall meet at the clerk’s office of the county or city for which they are appointed at or before 5:00 p.m. on the day after any election. The board may adjourn to the principal office of the general registrar. It shall open the returns delivered to the clerk’s office by the officers,” and inserted “in which no person was elected by write-in votes, and” into the second sentence of the next-to-last paragraph.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 824 added “and may adjourn from day to day as needed, not to exceed seven calendar days from the date of election” at the end of the next-to-last sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 689 added the last two paragraphs.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 486 deleted “from day to day” following “and may adjourn” in the first paragraph.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 536 substituted “10 percent” for “five percent” in clause (i) of the fourth paragraph.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 459, effective July 1, 2021, deleted “of this title” in the fourth paragraph at the end; and added the last sentence of the last paragraph.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 443 and 444 are identical, and inserted “unless an extension has been granted to accommodate a risk-limiting audit conducted pursuant to §

24.2-671.2

” in the first paragraph.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 2-1301. Juror Qualification Form.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Counties, § 14; 6B M.J. Elections, §§ 38, 72.

§ 24.2-671.2.
Risk-limiting audits.

For the purposes of this section:

“Contested race” means an election for an office where more names appear on the ballot then there are vacancies to be filled or a statewide referendum or proposed constitutional amendment.

“Risk limit” means the largest probability that the risk-limiting audit will fail to correct an election outcome that differs from the outcome that would be found by a full manual tabulation of the votes on all ballots cast in the contested race.

“Risk-limiting audit” means an audit protocol conducted after an election and prior to the certification of the election results with a pre-specified minimum probability of requiring a full hand count of votes cast if the outcome reported by the voting system differs from the outcome that would be found by a full hand count of the votes in a contested race. A “risk-limiting audit” requires a hand count of randomly sampled printed ballots that continues until there is either strong statistical evidence that the reported outcome is correct or, in the absence of such evidence, a full hand count of all ballots cast in the contested race that determines the outcome.

Risk-limiting audits conducted pursuant to this section shall be performed by the local electoral boards and general registrars under the supervision of the Department and in accordance with the procedures prescribed by the State Board, including:

Processes for randomly selecting contested races and determining the risk limit.

Procedures for preparing for a risk-limiting audit, including guidelines for organizing ballots, selecting venues, and securing appropriate materials by local electoral boards and general registrars.

Procedures for ballot custody, accounting, security, and written record retention that ensure that the collection of cast ballots from which samples are drawn is complete and accurate throughout the audit.

Procedures for hand counting of the audited ballots.

Processes and methods for conducting the risk-limiting audit.

Procedures for ensuring transparency and understanding of the process by participants and the public, including guidelines for direct observation by members of the public, representatives of the candidates involved in the risk-limiting audit, and representatives of the political parties.

The Department shall provide that the following risk-limiting audits be conducted:

In the year of a general election for members of the United States House of Representatives, a risk-limiting audit of at least one randomly selected contested race for such office;

(Effective July 1, 2023) In the year of a general election for members of the General Assembly, a risk-limiting audit of at least one randomly selected contested race for such office;

(Effective July 1, 2024) In any year in which there is not a general election for a statewide office, a risk-limiting audit of at least one randomly selected contested race for a local office, including constitutional offices, for which certification by the State Board is required under §

24.2-680

; and

(Effective July 1, 2023) In any year, any other risk-limiting audit of a contested race that is necessary to ensure that each locality participates in a risk-limiting audit of an office within its jurisdiction at least once every five years or that the State Board finds appropriate. Such audits must be approved by at least a two-thirds majority vote of all members of the Board.

A local electoral board may request that the State Board approve the conduct of a risk-limiting audit for a contested race within the local electoral board’s jurisdiction. The state board shall promulgate regulations for submitting such requests. The State Board shall grant an extension of the local electoral board’s certification deadline under §

24.2-671

as necessary to accommodate the conduct of a risk-limiting audit conducted pursuant to this subsection. The Department may count a risk-limiting audit conducted pursuant to this subsection toward the requirement in subdivision C 4.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections C and D, no contested race shall be selected to receive a risk-limiting audit if the tabulation of the unofficial result for the contested race shows a difference of not more than one percent of the total vote cast for the top two candidates.

Upon the tabulation of the unofficial results of an election, the State Board shall determine, in accordance with subsection C, all the contested races for that election that will receive a risk-limiting audit and shall set the risk limit to be applied in such audits. As soon as practicable after selection of the contests to be audited, the Department shall publish a notice of the contested races in accordance with the requirements for public meetings in §

2.2-3707

. The Department shall provide support to local electoral boards and general registrars in preparing to hold the risk-limiting audits.

The local electoral board and general registrar shall conduct a risk-limiting audit within their jurisdiction at the date, time, and location noticed by the Department. At least one member of the local electoral board representing each party shall participate in the risk-limiting audit and be present for the duration of the risk-limiting audit when ballots are being selected and counted and calculations are being made. All risk-limiting audits shall be conducted in a place and manner that is open to the public. At the conclusion of a risk-limiting audit, all audit materials, including ballots and any records generated during the course of the audit, shall be delivered to the clerk of the circuit court and retained as election materials pursuant to §

24.2-668

.

The local electoral board in coordination with the general registrar shall promptly report the results of a risk-limiting audit of any contested races subject to §

24.2-680

in their jurisdiction to the Department. The results of any risk-limiting audit for a local contested race shall also be retained by the local electoral board. At the conclusion of each risk-limiting audit requiring certification by the State Board, the Department shall submit to the State Board a report, which shall include all data generated by the risk-limiting audit and all information required to confirm that the risk-limiting audit was conducted in accordance with the procedures adopted by the State Board. The Department shall publish the results of all risk-limiting audits pursuant to this section on the Department’s website.

If a risk-limiting audit of a contested race escalates to a full hand count, the results of the hand count shall be used to certify the election in lieu of the tabulation of the unofficial results obtained prior to the conduct of the risk-limiting audit. A full hand count conducted pursuant to this section shall not be construed as a recount under Chapter 8 (§

24.2-800

et seq.). Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the rights of a candidate under Chapter 8.

History.

2022, cc. 443, 444.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, cc. 443 and
444, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of subdivisions C 2 and 4 of
§

24.2-671.2

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective on July 1, 2023.”

Acts
2022, cc. 443 and
444, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of subdivision C 3 of
§

24.2-671.2

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective on July 1, 2024.”

Acts
2022, cc. 443 and
444, cl. 4 provides: “That, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection F of
§

24.2-671.2

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, the risk limit for all risk-limiting audits conducted pursuant to that subsection shall be at least 10 percent.”

§ 24.2-672.
Electoral board to correct irregularities in returns of officers of election.

While ascertaining the results of an election, the electoral board may find that there are irregularities or informalities in the returns of the officers of election which can be cured by amending or correcting the returns. Then the board immediately shall summon, to appear before the board on the date of the summons or the next date thereafter, the officers of elections required to amend the returns so that the same may conform to the law. The summons may be executed by any person authorized by law to serve summonses for witnesses.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-275; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-147; 1992, c. 329; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-673.
Candidates having highest number of votes to receive certificate of election.

Except in the case of a recount pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 8 (§

24.2-800

et seq.) of this title, in all elections for the choice of any officer, unless it is otherwise expressly provided, the person having the highest number of votes for any office shall be deemed to have been elected to such office and shall receive the certificate of election.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-276; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-148; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-673.1.
(Expires July 1, 2031) Ranked choice voting.

For purposes of this section:“Ranked choice voting” means a method of casting and tabulating votes in which (i) voters rank candidates in order of preference, (ii) tabulation proceeds in rounds such that in each of round either a candidate or candidates are elected or the last-place candidate is defeated, (iii) votes for voters’ next-ranked candidates are transferred from elected or defeated candidates, and (iv) tabulation ends when the number of candidates elected equals the number of offices to be filled. “Ranked choice voting” is known as “instant runoff voting” when electing a single office and “single transferable vote” when electing multiple offices.“Ranking” means the ordinal number assigned on a ballot by a voter to a candidate to express the voter’s preference for that candidate. Ranking number one is the highest ranking, ranking number two is the next-highest ranking, and so on, consecutively, up to the number of candidates indicated on the ballot.

Elections of members of a county board of supervisors or a city council may be conducted by ranked choice voting pursuant to this section. The decision to conduct an election by ranked choice voting shall be made, in consultation with the local electoral board and general registrar, by a majority vote of the board of supervisors or city council that the office being elected serves.

The State Board may promulgate regulations for the proper and efficient administration of elections determined by ranked choice voting, including (i) procedures for tabulating votes in rounds, (ii) procedures for determining winners in elections for offices to which only one candidate is being elected and to which more than one candidate is being elected, and (iii) standards for ballots pursuant to §

24.2-613

, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection E of that section.

The State Board may administer or prescribe standards for a voter outreach and public information program for use by any locality conducting ranked choice voting pursuant to this section.

History.

2020, c. 1054.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1054, cl. 2 provides: “That any costs incurred by the Department of Elections related to changes in technology that are necessary for the implementation of this act, including changes to technology for receiving the results of elections conducted pursuant to this act, shall be charged to the localities exercising the option to proceed with ranked choice voting.”

Acts 2020, c. 1054, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, c. 1054, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2031.”

§ 24.2-674.
Determination by lot in case of tie.

If, prior to a recount, two or more persons have an equal number of votes for any county, city, town, or district office, and a higher number than any other person, the electoral board shall proceed publicly to determine by lot which of the candidates shall be declared elected.

If, prior to a recount, any two or more persons have an equal number of votes and a higher number than any other person for member of the General Assembly or of the Congress of the United States, or if any two or more persons have an equal number of votes and a higher number than any other person for elector of President and Vice President of the United States, the State Board of Elections shall proceed publicly to determine by lot which of them shall be declared elected. Reasonable notice shall be given to such candidates of the time when such elections shall be so determined; and if they, or either of them, shall fail to appear in accordance with such notice, the Board shall proceed so as to determine the election in their absence.

Any person who loses the determination by lot may petition for a recount pursuant to Article 1 (§

24.2-800

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of this title.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-277, 24-290; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-149; 1993, c. 641; 2020, c. 500.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 500, in the first paragraph and in the second paragraph in the first sentence, inserted “prior to a recount”; in the second paragraph in the first sentence, inserted “if any two or more persons have an equal number of votes and a higher number than any other person for” and made stylistic changes.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 75.

§ 24.2-675.
Abstracts of votes to be made by secretary and forwarded to State Board and to clerks.

As soon as the electoral board determines the persons who have received the highest number of votes for any office, the secretary shall make out an abstract of the votes for each of the following: Governor; Lieutenant Governor; Attorney General; members of the Senate of Virginia; members of the House of Delegates; members of the United States Senate; members of the United States House of Representatives; electors of the President and Vice President of the United States; each county office; each city office; each district office; each town office; and such others as may be required for statewide referenda. The abstracts shall contain the names of all persons receiving any vote for each office and the total number of votes received by each person or for or against each question. However, if no person was elected by write-in votes and the total number of write-in votes for any office is less than (i) 10 percent of the total number of votes cast for that office and (ii) the total number of votes cast for the candidate receiving the most votes, the abstract shall contain only the total number of write-in votes and not the number of write-in votes for each person receiving write-in votes.

The abstracts shall be certified and signed by the electoral board, attested by the secretary, and retained by the electoral board as part of its records. A copy of each, certified under the official seal of the electoral board, shall immediately be mailed or delivered by hand to the State Board. The State Board shall require the electoral board of any county or city to correct any errors found on such abstracts prior to completing the requirements of §

24.2-679

.

One certified copy of each abstract of votes shall be forwarded (i) to the clerk of the city council or board of supervisors and recorded in its record book, (ii) for town elections, to the clerk of the town council and recorded in its minute book, and (iii) for each local referendum, to the circuit court for the locality.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-278 through 24-280; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-150; 1972, c. 620; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1981, c. 425; 1993, c. 641; 1996, c. 223; 2003, c. 1015; 2018, c. 536.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, inserted “if no person was elected by write-in votes and” in the last sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 536 substituted “10 percent” for “five percent” in clause (i) of the first paragraph.

§ 24.2-676.
Secretary to make out and deliver certificate of election.

Immediately after the electoral board has determined the election results, the secretary shall make out certificates of election for each county, city, town, or district office other than an office shared by more than one county or city, or any combination thereof. The secretary shall make out the certificate for each of the persons who has the highest number of votes for the office, who has sufficient votes to be elected to a multi-member office, or, in case of a tie, who has been decided by lot to be elected. The secretary, or another board member or registrar designated by the secretary, shall deliver in person or the secretary shall transmit by certified mail the certificate to the person elected, as soon as such person has complied with the provisions of §

24.2-948.2

.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-282; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-151; 1972, c. 620; 1975, c. 515; 1980, c. 639; 1983, c. 264; 1993, c. 641; 2006, cc. 787, 892.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 787 and 892 are identical, and substituted “§

24.2-948.2

” for “§ 24.2-922” in the third sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 81.

§ 24.2-677.
State Board to open and record returns; application of Freedom of Information Act.

The State Board, on receipt of the certified abstracts of the votes given in the several counties and cities, shall open the abstracts and record and carefully preserve them.

The provisions of Chapter 37 (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) of Title 2.2, the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, shall not apply to the certified abstracts of the votes or any other documents used by the Board in ascertaining the results of any election until the results have been finally determined by the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-283; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-152; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 206; 1975, c. 515; 1980, c. 639; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-678.
Law-enforcement officer to be sent for abstracts not forwarded.

If the State Board has not received the abstracts of votes from any county or city within seven days after any election, it shall dispatch a law-enforcement officer to obtain a copy of the abstract from the official having charge thereof.
That official shall immediately, on demand of the officer, make out and deliver to him the copy required, and the officer shall deliver the abstract to the State Board without delay.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-284; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-153; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-679.
State Board to meet and make statement as to number of votes.

The State Board shall meet by the first Monday in December to ascertain the results of the November election. If a majority of the Board is not present or if, for any other reason, the Board is unable to ascertain the results on that day, the meeting shall stand adjourned from day to day for not more than three days until a quorum is present and the Board has ascertained the results as provided in this section.

The Board shall examine the certified abstracts on file in its office and make statements of the whole number of votes given at any such election for members of the General Assembly, Governor, Lieutenant Governor and Attorney General, members of the United States Congress and electors of President and Vice President of the United States, and any officer shared by more than one county or city, or any combination thereof, or for so many of such officers as have been voted for at the election.

The statement shall show, for each office and each county, city, and election district, the whole number of votes given to each candidate and to any other person elected to office. The Board members shall certify the statements to be correct and sign the statements. The Board shall then determine those persons who received the greatest number of votes and have been duly elected to each office. The Board members shall endorse and subscribe on such statements a certificate of their determination. The Board shall record each certified statement and determination in a suitable book to be kept by it in its office.

The State Board shall meet as soon as possible after it receives the returns for any special election held at a time other than the November general election to ascertain the results of the special election in the manner prescribed in subsection A. If the returns have not been received within seven days of the election, the Board shall meet and adjourn from day to day until it receives the returns, ascertains the results, and makes its determination.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-285, 24-286, 24-287, 24-289; 1958, c. 605; 1962, c. 536; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-154, 24.1-155; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 206; 1974, c. 428; 1980, c. 639; 1983, c. 461; 1993, c. 641; 2015, c. 740; 2022, cc. 443, 444.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “third Monday” for “fourth Monday” in the first paragraph of subsection A.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 443 and 444 are identical, and substituted “by the first Monday in December” for “on the third Monday in November” in subsection A in the first paragraph.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 2-1301. Juror Qualification Form.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 72.